Maine, session 132, LD653.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §663, sub-§3, ¶K, as amended by PL 2009, c. 529, §2, is further
amended to read:
K. A salaried employee who works in a bona fide executive, administrative or
professional capacity and whose regular compensation, when converted to an annual
rate, exceeds 3000 times the State's minimum hourly wage or the annualized rate
established by the United States Department of Labor under the federal Fair Labor
Standards Act, whichever is higher, except for an employee whose primary duty
consists of work as a teacher in the activity of imparting knowledge if the individual is
both employed and engaged as a teacher; and